Vermont, session 2025-2026, H766.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 24 V.S.A. § 138 is amended to read:
§ 138. LOCAL OPTION TAXES
(a) Local option taxes are authorized under this section for the purpose of
affording municipalities an alternative method of raising municipal revenues.
Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section, and subject to certification
by the Commissioner of Taxes, a local option tax shall be effective beginning
on the next tax quarter following 90 days’ notice to the Department of Taxes of
the imposition.
VT LEG #385452 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.766
2026 Page 2 of 6
(b) If the legislative body of a municipality by a majority vote
recommends, the voters of a municipality may, at an annual or special meeting
warned for that purpose, by a majority vote of those present and voting, assess
any or all of the following:
(1) a one percent sales tax;
(2) a one percent meals and alcoholic beverages tax;
(3) a one percent rooms tax;
(4) a $0.01 tax upon each gallon of gasoline motor fuel sold or delivered
by a distributor;
(5) a $0.01 tax upon each gallon of diesel fuel sold or delivered by a
distributor.
(c)(1) Any tax Taxes imposed under the authority subdivisions (b)(1)–(3)
of this section shall be collected and administered by the Department of Taxes,
in accordance with State law governing such State tax or taxes and subdivision
(2) of this subsection; provided, however, that a sales tax imposed under this
section shall be collected on each sale that is subject to the Vermont sales tax
using a destination basis for taxation. Taxes imposed under subdivisions (b)(4)
and (5) of this section shall be collected and administered by the Department of
Motor Vehicles in accordance with State law governing such tax. Except with
respect to taxes collected on the sale of aviation jet fuel, a per-return fee of
$5.96 shall be assessed, 75 percent of which shall be borne by the
VT LEG #385452 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.766
2026 Page 3 of 6
municipality, and 25 percent of which shall be borne by the State to be paid
from the PILOT Special Fund. Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 603 or any other
provision of law or municipal charter to the contrary, revenue from the fee
shall be used to compensate the Department Departments for the costs of
administering and collecting the local option tax and of administering the State
appraisal and litigation program established in 32 V.S.A. § 5413. The fee shall
be subject to the provisions of 32 V.S.A. § 605.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law or municipal charter to the contrary,
if the applicable Commissioner determines that local option tax was collected
on a transaction in a municipality not authorized to impose local option tax
under this section, the Commissioner shall either refund the erroneously
collected tax pursuant to 27 V.S.A. chapter 27 or 28, or 32 V.S.A. chapter 233
or 225 or, if the purchaser cannot reasonably be determined, deposit the
erroneously collected tax as required for State diesel fuel and gasoline taxes
pursuant to 19 V.S.A. § 11(2); State sales and use tax pursuant to 16 V.S.A.
§ 4025(a)(6); or State meals and rooms tax pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 1388(a)(4),
16 V.S.A. § 4025(a)(4), and 32 V.S.A. § 435(b)(7).
(d)(1) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section and subdivision
(2) of this subsection with respect to taxes collected on the sale of aviation jet
fuel, of the taxes collected under this section, 75 percent of the taxes shall be
paid on a quarterly basis to the municipality in which they were collected, after
VT LEG #385452 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.766
2026 Page 4 of 6
reduction for the costs of administration and collection under subsection (c) of
this section. Revenues received by a municipality may be expended for
municipal services only, and not for education expenditures. Any remaining
revenue shall be deposited into the PILOT Special Fund established by 32
V.S.A. § 3709.
(2)(A) Of the taxes collected under this section on the sale of aviation jet
fuel, on a quarterly basis, 70 percent of the taxes shall be paid to the
municipality in which they were collected, and 30 percent shall be deposited in
the Transportation Fund.
(B) All revenues referenced in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (2)
shall be used exclusively for aviation purposes consistent with 49 U.S.C.
§ 47133 and Federal Aviation Administration regulations and policies.
(e) As used in this section, “municipality” means a city, town, or
incorporated village.
(f) Nothing in this section shall affect the validity of any existing provision
of law or municipal charter authorizing a municipality to impose a tax similar
to the local option taxes authorized in this section.
(g) If the legislative body of a municipality by a majority vote recommends
or by petition of ten percent of the voters of a municipality recommends, the
voters of a municipality may at an annual or special meeting warned for that
VT LEG #385452 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.766
2026 Page 5 of 6
purpose by a majority vote of those present and voting rescind any or all of the
local option taxes assessed under subsection (b) of this section.
(h)(1) The Commissioner of Taxes may limit the number of municipalities
enacting a local option tax under subsection (b) of this section to five per
calendar year. For local option taxes authorized under subdivisions (b)(4) and
(5) of this section, the Commissioner of Taxes shall consult with the
Commissioner of Motor Vehicles before acting pursuant to this subsection.
(2) The Commissioner of Taxes shall certify the first five notices from
municipalities it receives under subsection (a) of this section in each calendar
year and those municipalities may proceed to assess a local option tax
according to subsection (a) of this section.
(3) In the Commissioner’s discretion, after receiving notice from the
fifth municipality pursuant to subsection (a) of this section in a calendar year,
the Commissioner of Taxes may delay certification, or reject further notices for
that year, if the Commissioner determines that additional certifications would
cause an undue burden on tax administration.
(i) As used in this section:
(1) “Diesel fuel” means “fuel” as defined in 23 V.S.A. § 3002.
(2) “Distributor” means “distributor” as defined in 23 V.S.A. § 3002 or
3102.
VT LEG #385452 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.766
2026 Page 6 of 6
(3) “Gasoline motor fuel” means “gasoline or other motor fuel” as is set
forth in 23 V.S.A. § 3102, except that it shall not include aviation gasoline.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
VT LEG #385452 v.1